Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Operation and Management of Local Correctional Facilities

441.025.
County responsibility for incarceration of prisoners.

The fiscal court of each county shall provide for the incarceration of prisoners arrested in the county or sentenced or held by order of the courts in the county.

The fiscal court shall provide for the incarceration of prisoners by:

Providing and maintaining a facility that complies with KRS

441.055

;

Providing and maintaining a safe, secure, and clean jail in the county; or that complies with the health and life safety standards defined in KRS

441.055

;

Contracting with another county or a city for the incarceration and care of its prisoners; and

Providing for the transportation of prisoners, as provided for in KRS

441.505

and

441.510

including the provision of vehicles, drivers, and guards.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county from providing facilities for holding prisoners for limited periods of time and contracting with another county or a city for longer periods of incarceration.

Any county may enter into an agreement pursuant to KRS

65.210

to

65.300

to provide or to use jail facilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 2, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 141, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 108, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

441.030.
Transfer of prisoners to secure jail — Circuit judge may order. [Renumbered.]

441.035.
United States and cities may use county jails.

The United States may use the jail of any county, and any city may use the jail of the county in which the city is located for the incarceration of prisoners charged with or convicted of violations of the city’s ordinances, by paying the county the fees set by agreement with the fiscal court for the type of services rendered. Any jailer shall receive and confine in jail, until lawfully discharged, persons committed under the laws of the United States or for a violation of the ordinances of any city within the county.

History.

2227, 2228: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 39, effective July 1, 1982.

441.040.
Manner of transfer — Compensation of officers — Computation of expenses. [Renumbered.]

441.045.
Rules for jails — Inspection by county judge/executive — Medical, dental, and psychological care for prisoners — Funds not to lapse — Fee for use of jail medical facilities by state prisoner — Payments to counties not to exceed Medicaid rate — Transportation of prisoners for health care — Responsibility for health care expenses.

The county governing body shall prescribe rules for the government, security, safety, and cleanliness of the jail and the comfort and treatment of prisoners, provided such rules are consistent with state law. The county judge/executive may inspect the jail at any reasonable time.

Willful violation of the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed a violation.

Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the cost of providing necessary medical, dental, and psychological care for indigent prisoners in the jail shall be paid from the jail budget.

The cost of providing necessary medical, dental, or psychological care for prisoners of the United States government shall be paid as provided by contract between the United States government and the county or as may otherwise be provided by federal law.

The cost of providing necessary medical, dental, or psychological care, beyond routine care and diagnostic services, for prisoners held pursuant to a contractual agreement with the state shall be paid as provided by contract between the state and county. The costs of necessary medical, dental, or psychological care, beyond routine care and diagnostic services, of prisoners held in the jail for which the county receives a per diem payment shall be paid by the state.

To the extent that federal law allows and federal financial participation is available, for the limited purpose of implementing this section, the jail, the department, or the department’s designee is authorized to act on behalf of an inmate for purposes of applying for Medicaid eligibility.

The cost of providing necessary medical, dental, or psychological care for prisoners held pursuant to a contractual agreement with another county or a city shall be paid as provided by contract between the county or city and county.

When the cost of necessary medical, dental, or psychological care for a prisoner exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), as calculated by using the maximum allowable costs to similar persons or facilities for the same or similar services under the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program, the state shall reimburse the county for that portion of the costs that exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000). The reimbursement shall be subject to the following terms and conditions:

The care is necessary as defined in subsection (10) of this section;

The prisoner is indigent as defined in subsection (8) of this section, or is uninsured; and

No state reimbursement to the county for care provided by physicians, hospitals, laboratories, or other health care providers shall exceed the maximum payments allowed to similar persons or facilities for the same or similar services under the Kentucky Medical Assistance Program, except as provided in subsection (11) of this section.

A county may assign its ability to receive payment from the state under this subsection to the person providing the medical, dental, or psychological care to the prisoner, which assignment shall be accepted by the provider for the purposes of submitting billing directly to the state. The state shall pay or deny a claim submitted to it within ninety (90) days of receiving the claim. The county shall include with the assignment the information required by subsection (8) of this section necessary to qualify the prisoner as indigent. The provider shall bill for any other public or private health benefit plan or health insurance benefits available to the prisoner prior to billing the state under this subsection, and shall bill the state prior to billing the county. The county shall retain ultimate payment responsibility as established under subsection (3) of this section, and the provider may bill the county for payment after the expiration of ninety (90) days from the date the provider submitted the claim to the state for payment if the claim remains unpaid at that time.

The determination of whether a prisoner is indigent shall be made pursuant to KRS

31.120

, and may be evidenced by the affidavit of indigency required by that statute or the appointment of a public defender under that statute. The prisoner shall not be considered indigent, in the case of prisoner medical care, if:

The prisoner has funds on his or her inmate account to cover all or a portion of his or her medical expenses;

The prisoner’s medical expenses are covered on a medical insurance policy; or

The prisoner has the private resources to pay for the use of the medical facilities.

Prisoners who are later determined not to have been indigent, or who at a time following treatment are no longer indigent, shall be required to repay the costs of payments made pursuant to this section to the unit of government which made the payment.

The terms and conditions relating to any determination of nonindigency and demands for repayment shall be under the same terms and conditions as are provided under KRS Chapters 31 and 431 relating to similar circumstances in the program for defense of indigents by the public advocate.

For the purposes of this section, “necessary care” means care of a nonelective nature that cannot be postponed until after the period of confinement without hazard to the life or health of the prisoner.

Any money appropriated for a given fiscal year to fund the state’s obligation under subsection (7) of this section which remains unspent at the end of the year shall not lapse but shall be made available to satisfy, to the maximum extent possible, that portion of each catastrophic claim made during said year above the threshold amount for which the county did not receive state assistance pursuant to subsection (7) of this section. In the event there is an insufficient surplus to satisfy said balance of all such catastrophic claims which are made during that year, the state shall pay to those qualified counties, on a per claim basis, an amount equal to each claim’s percentage of the total surplus. Should the surplus be sufficient to satisfy all such catastrophic claims, the amount remaining, if any, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year to be made available for future catastrophic claims.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section to the contrary, a jail may impose a reasonable fee for the use of jail medical facilities by a prisoner who has the ability to pay for the medical care. These funds may be deducted from the prisoner’s inmate account. A prisoner shall not be denied medical treatment because he or she has insufficient funds on his or her inmate account. This subsection shall not preclude other recovery of funds as provided in this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a jail may impose a reasonable fee for the use of jail medical facilities by a state prisoner who has been placed in a jail pursuant to a contract with the Department of Corrections under KRS

532.100

or other statute, and who has the ability to pay for medical care.

Funds may be deducted from the state prisoner’s inmate account at the jail.

A state prisoner shall not be denied medical treatment because he or she has insufficient funds in his or her inmate account.

This subsection shall not preclude other recovery of funds as provided in this section.

This subsection does not authorize recovery of funds from a prisoner for medical care which has been paid or reimbursed by the state pursuant to this section.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all payments for necessary medical, dental, or psychological care for jail, regional jail, or holdover prisoners shall be made at a rate not to exceed the Medicaid rate for the same or similar services, which shall be paid within thirty (30) days under the provisions of KRS

65.140

of receiving a claim from the health facility or provider for the item or service. This subsection shall not obligate the Medicaid program to pay for services provided to a prisoner.

A peace officer or correctional officer having custody of a person shall not release the person from custody so that the person may receive treatment from a health care facility or health care provider, except pursuant to an order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction which specifically names the person to receive treatment.

A peace officer or correctional officer having custody of a person may take the person to a health care facility or health care provider for the purpose of receiving treatment if a correctional officer remains with the person during the time the person is on the premises of the health care facility or health care provider, unless the facility or provider consents to the absence of the officer.

A county, urban-county, consolidated local government, charter county, unified local government, jail, regional jail, holdover, local detention center, or other local correctional facility shall not be responsible for paying for the medical or other health care costs of a person who is released by a court of competent jurisdiction, except where the release is for the purpose of receiving medical or other health care services as evidenced by an order requiring the person to return to custody upon completion of treatment.

When a county, urban-county, consolidated local government, charter county, unified local government, jail, regional jail, holdover, local detention center, or other local correctional facility is responsible for paying for medical or other health care costs under paragraph (c) of this subsection, payment shall be made only at the Medicaid rate for same or similar services.

For the purposes of this subsection, “correctional officer” includes a:

Jailer or deputy jailer;

Director or other person in charge of a local detention center, local correctional facility, or regional jail; and

Correctional officer employed by a local detention center, local correctional facility, or regional jail.

History.

2233, 2235: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 2, effective January 1, 1978; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 457, effective January 2, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 1, effective May 12, 1979; 1982, ch. 385, § 38, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 415, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 343, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 61, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 108, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 8, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 2, § 75, effective June 8, 2011; 2013, ch. 69, § 11, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 94, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 109, § 7, effective April 24, 2020.

441.046.
Persons in adult or juvenile detention facility to be fingerprinted — Failure of jailer to comply.

All persons arrested or detained in any adult or juvenile detention facility shall be fingerprinted prior to the person’s release from custody. A copy of these fingerprints shall be transmitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police for review.

The jailer shall fingerprint persons for other law enforcement agencies.

The jailer shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police in the manner and at the time required by the Department of Kentucky State Police through administrative regulation.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall notify the Department of Corrections and the jailer, in writing, of the intentional failure of a jailer to comply with subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section. Upon the first receipt of the notification of an intentional failure to comply with subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, the Department of Corrections shall issue a formal written warning to the jailer setting forth the consequences of continued intentional failure to comply with subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

If the jailer intentionally failed to comply with any fingerprinting requirements of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, after being warned of such intentional failure, the Department of Corrections shall have authority to withhold the state contribution under KRS

441.206

and may require the jailer to return the state contribution funds received under KRS

441.206

for any period in which he or she intentionally failed to comply after being warned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 30, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 182, § 29, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 323, effective June 26, 2007.

441.047.
Psychiatric and similar services for criminal defendants.

Whenever a prisoner confined in the county jail is in need of psychiatric or similar evaluation, treatment, or services, it shall be the responsibility of the Commonwealth to provide such evaluation, treatment, or services at the expense of the Commonwealth at the nearest state-operated or state-supported facility suitable for the provision of the required evaluation, treatment, or services at no cost to the county.

Whenever a criminal defendant is in need of psychiatric, sociological, or similar evaluation in connection with the criminal proceedings in which he is a defendant it shall be the responsibility of the Commonwealth to provide the evaluation at the nearest state-operated or state-supported facility suitable for the provision of the required evaluation at no cost to the county.

In the event that no suitable state-operated or state-supported facility is located within a reasonable distance, then the evaluation may be made at a suitable local facility or at the jail. In such instances a request must first be made to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to provide the evaluation, treatment, or service unless the situation is an emergency requiring immediate attention. If the cabinet cannot provide the service or if the situation is an emergency, then local resources may be utilized.

In the event that local resources are utilized in an emergency situation, or when the Cabinet for Health and Family Services is unable to provide the evaluation, treatment, or service, then the reasonable cost of providing such service, treatment, or evaluation shall be paid from the State Treasury in the same manner as other medical expenses of indigent prisoners confined in the county jail.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall administer the provisions of this section and shall issue such administrative regulations as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 155, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 426, § 603, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 651, effective June 20, 2005.

441.048.
Screening for mental health risk issues upon admittance to detention.

Every prisoner, upon admittance to detention, shall be screened for mental health risk issues, including mental illness, suicide, intellectual disabilities, and acquired brain injury, by the personnel of the facility in which facility the prisoner is detained. Facilities have the discretion of using the telephonic behavioral health jail triage system created in KRS

210.365

. Where the triage system indicates levels of behavioral health risk, the facility holding the prisoner may consider implementing the recommended protocols for housing, supervision, and care delivery that match the level of risk.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 137, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2012, ch. 146, § 119, effective July 12, 2012.

441.050.
Prisoner transferred to penitentiary when violence threatened — Officer’s compensation. [Renumbered.]

441.052.
Insurance coverage of prisoner — Subrogation of rights to Department of Corrections’ contractee for medical and pharmaceutical services.

When a unit of local government or regional jail authority facilitates medical care for a prisoner confined in the jail, holdover, or regional jail who has not been convicted as a felon and who holds a policy, contract, or certificate of insurance coverage in any form, the insurer shall be primary for payment of medically necessary health care benefit claims provided the following conditions are met:

The reimbursement shall be for medical, dental, or psychological claims that are covered benefits under the terms and conditions of the health benefit plan held by the prisoner;

The reimbursement shall be applied under the terms and conditions of the health benefit plan and in the same manner as though the insured were not a prisoner; and

All premiums for the health benefit plan are current.

If the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority has contracted with the Department of Corrections under the Department of Corrections’ contract for medical, dental, or psychological care access, or drugs, medicines, or pharmaceutical services, then the rights of the local government, combination of local governments, or regional jail authority shall be subrogated to the contract provider of such services to the Department of Corrections.

If the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority has, with the approval of the Department of Corrections, contracted with another pharmaceutical services provider, then the rights of the local government, combination of local governments, or regional jail authority shall be subrogated to the contract provider of medical, dental, or psychological care to the local jail for access to drugs, medicines, or pharmaceutical services to the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority.

If a prisoner has been transferred from a local jail, regional jail, or holdover to the Department of Corrections for medical care pursuant to KRS

441.560

, then the contract provider of drugs and pharmaceutical services or the contract provider of medical, dental, or psychological care shall be subrogated to the provider of such services to the Department of Corrections.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 128, § 3, effective June 26, 2007.

441.053.
Required use of the Department of Corrections’ pharmacy plan and medical, dental, and psychological care access plan — Waivers — Ineligible contractees — Appeal — Reimbursement not to exceed Medicaid rate.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each jail, regional jail, holdover, or other correctional facility owned or operated by a unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority shall utilize the Department of Corrections’ contract pharmacy plan.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the Department of Corrections shall, on a yearly basis, waive the requirement of subsection (1) of this section if the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority proves to the Department of Corrections that the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority has contracted with another vendor and that:

The prescription plan covers pharmacy services, drugs, and medicine in a manner which is equal to or superior to the Department of Corrections’ contract pharmacy plan; and

The cost of the prescription plan is equal to or less in total cost, including the product cost and all other costs associated with the delivery of the drugs, than the Department of Corrections’ contract pharmacy plan.

If a unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority contracts with a private provider of comprehensive health services for inmates, then that private provider may elect not to use the Department of Corrections’ contract pharmacy plan and a waiver under this subsection shall not be required.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each jail, regional jail, holdover, or other correctional facility owned or operated by a unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority shall utilize the Department of Corrections’ contract medical, dental, and psychological care access plan, and the administrative service fee for the plan shall be paid by the Department of Corrections subject to the limits of 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 128, sec. 5.

The Department of Corrections may, on a yearly basis, waive the requirement of subsection (3) of this section if the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority proves to the Department of Corrections that the unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority has contracted with another vendor and that:

The medical, dental, and psychological care access plan provides services and access which is equal to or superior to the Department of Corrections’ contract medical, dental, and psychological care access plan; and

The cost of the medical, dental, and psychological care access plan is equal to or less in cost than the Department of Corrections’ contract medical, dental, and psychological care access plan.

An entity, corporation, or organization of any kind that assists the Department of Corrections in managing claims or evaluating an application for a waiver under subsection (2) or (4) of this section shall not seek or be awarded a contract to provide:

Medical care;

Dental care;

Psychological care;

Pharmaceutical products; or

Any other health care service;

to inmates housed in any jail operated by any unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority.

The prohibition in this subsection shall also apply to the entity’s, corporation’s, or organization of any kind’s:

Owners;

Incorporators;

Officers;

Employees; or

Other person who has a financial interest in the organization.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit or limit the ability of a state university to provide health care services to prison populations.

The provisions of subsection (5) of this section shall not apply if an entity, corporation, organization, or person referenced in subsection (5)(b) of this section is:

Already a party to a contract with any consolidated local government or urban-county government and is currently engaged in providing the services or products referenced in subsection (5)(a) of this section; and

There is no material change to the existing contract with any consolidated local government or urban-county government within a reasonable time period;

prior to seeking or being awarded a contract with the department to manage claims or evaluate an application for a waiver under subsection (2) or (4) of this section. No provision of this subsection shall be construed to prohibit or limit the ability of a state university to provide health care services to prison populations.

A unit of local government, combination of units of local government, or regional jail authority may appeal a decision of the Department of Corrections denying a waiver under subsection (2) or (4) of this section to the secretary of justice and public safety.

No program specified in this section shall require or permit reimbursement at a rate in excess of the Kentucky Medicaid program for the same or similar services or products but may permit a lesser rate of reimbursement.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 128, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 64, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 2, § 76, effective June 8, 2011; 2015 ch. 111, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

441.055.
Regulation of jails — Adoption and revision of standards — Classification of jails.

The Department of Corrections shall for those counties which elect to house state prisoners in their jail:

Adopt the recommendations of the Jail Standards Commission created pursuant to Executive Order Number 81-1026 and promulgate regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A establishing minimum standards for jails. These standards shall include but not be limited to rules governing the following areas:

Health and safety conditions;

Fire safety;

Jail operations, recordkeeping, and administration;

Curriculum of basic and continuing annual training for jailers and jail personnel;

Custody, care, and treatment of prisoners;

Medical care; and

Jail equipment, renovation, and construction.

These minimum standards shall specifically allow for:

Provision of required documents to prisoners through electronic format;

Confidential prisoner access to attorneys through unmonitored phone lines in non-contact visitation areas;

Measures to prevent receipt of prisoner mail containing intoxicants, including in fabricated legal mail; and

Delivery of mail received from the court, an attorney of record, or a public official to the prisoner via an electronic copy provided on a secure, personal account after opened and inspected in the presence of the prisoner;

Develop a jail standards review process, which shall include the participation of persons knowledgeable of jail operations to review and amend the standards as necessary. The jail standards shall be reviewed no later than December 31, 1992, and at least every two (2) years thereafter. Fifty percent (50%) of the participants in the review process shall be appointed from persons representing county interests and fifty percent (50%) shall be appointed from persons representing state interests; and

Provide technical assistance and consultation to local governments in order to facilitate compliance with standards.

The department shall, for those counties that elect not to hold state prisoners in their jails, adopt the recommendations of the Jail Standards Commission and promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish minimum standards for those jails. These standards shall be limited to health and life safety.

All minimum standards promulgated by the department applying to jails shall include requirements for adequate nutrition for pregnant prisoners, an adequate number of hygiene products for female prisoners, and an appropriate number of undergarments for female prisoners.

The department may establish classifications of jails based on the maximum permissible period of incarceration or other criteria and promulgate standards for each class of jail.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 6, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 114, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 108, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2014, ch. 132, § 21, effective July 15, 2014; 2018 ch. 115, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 138, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

441.057.
Administrative regulations governing juvenile holding facilities. [Repealed.]

441.060.
Expense of keeping and dieting prisoner transferred to penitentiary or reformatory — Who pays. [Renumbered.]

441.064.
Responsibilities of department — Jail inspections — Access to jails — Reports.

The department shall employ the jail consultants, inspectors, and other employees necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of KRS

441.055

to

441.075

.

The department shall inspect each jail biannually and may inspect jails more frequently.

The department shall be granted access at any reasonable time to any jail facility or part of any jail facility and shall be granted access to all books, records, and data pertaining to any jail which the department deems necessary for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of KRS

441.055

to

441.075

.

Following an inspection of a jail, the department shall make notification of the inspection by certified or electronic mail of any deficiencies which are discovered and documented. If the deficiencies are related to health or safety, the notification shall be sent within ten (10) working days, excluding weekends and holidays. The department shall submit an annual written report of the findings of its inspections and the condition of the jail to:

The jailer and the fiscal court in counties where the jail is governed by the county;

The jail administrator and the governing authority for a jail governed by an urban-county or metro government; and

The jail administrator, the regional board authority, and the fiscal courts of the counties represented in counties where the jail is governed by a regional jail board.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 7, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 116, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 262, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 108, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 102, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 107, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 126, § 4, effective June 24, 2015.

441.065.
Use and administration of jail in county containing city of first class, after establishment of workhouse or penal farm. [Repealed.]

441.067.
Canteen for prisoners — Books of accounts. [Renumbered.]

441.068.
Working of prisoners at community service related projects — Eligibility — Place of working. [Renumbered.]

441.070.
Fiscal court or urban-county council may establish workhouse. [Repealed.]

441.075.
Violation of regulations — Orders and sanctions — Procedures for orders.

If the department finds that a violation of its regulations, or the laws or other state regulations pertaining to the protection of persons and property, exists in any jail which holds state prisoners, the commissioner of the department, or his or her designee, shall order that the violation be corrected immediately. In order to enforce an order made pursuant to this subsection, the commissioner may order the jail to cease housing state prisoners.

If the department finds a violation of the health and life safety regulations in KRS

441.055

pertaining to the protection of persons or property, exists in any jail, the commissioner of the department, or his or her designee, shall order that the violations be corrected immediately. In order to enforce an order made pursuant to this subsection, the commissioner may order the jail closed until the violations are corrected.

No jail that was ordered by the Department of Corrections prior to July 15, 1996, to be closed or to operate other than as a full-service facility shall operate as a full-service facility to hold state prisoners unless it is granted a certificate of occupancy by the Department of Corrections. In order to enforce an order made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner may:

Order the jail or portions thereof to be vacated and closed until the violation is eliminated.

Order the jail to cease to house certain classes of prisoners or limit the length of time prisoners or certain classes of prisoners may be housed in the jail.

Order the state contribution made pursuant to KRS

441.206

to be used, in whole or in part, to contract with another county for the incarceration of prisoners.

An order issued under this section shall be in writing, incorporating the findings of the department and other agencies, if appropriate, and shall be delivered, electronically mailed, or mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the county jailer and county judge/executive within twenty-four (24) hours of the issuance of the order. The county jailer or county judge/executive may, within seventy-two (72) hours of receipt of the notification, request in writing a public hearing before the commissioner of the department or his or her designee on the matters covered by the order. Upon the hearing, the commissioner of the department or his or her designee may administer oaths and may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant books and papers. The commissioner of the department or his or her designee may issue, modify, or repeal the order at the conclusion of the hearing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 8, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 415, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 497, § 29, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 117, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 262, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 108, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 107, § 8, effective July 15, 2010.

441.080.
Joint construction, management and use of workhouse. [Repealed.]

441.085.
Violation of regulations prohibited — Department may seek court order — Civil contempt penalty.

No person responsible for the supervision or maintenance of a jail shall knowingly cause or permit the facility to be operated in violation of the regulations and laws of this state pertaining to the health, safety, security, and operation of jails.

When the department, pursuant to KRS

441.075

, orders a county jailer, if it is determined he is responsible, or the fiscal court, to correct or eliminate a violation of any state regulation or law pertaining to the operations and maintenance of jails and the county jailer or fiscal court does not take corrective action to the satisfaction of the department within the time specified in the department’s order, the commissioner of the department or his designee may request the Franklin County Circuit Court to enforce the orders of the department. Any person who refuses to obey the orders of the court shall be held in civil contempt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 9, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 118, effective July 14, 1992.

441.090.
Manager of workhouse — Appointment — Duties. [Repealed.]

441.095.
Appeals.

Appeals from any order issued pursuant to KRS

441.055

to

441.065

shall be granted as a matter of right, and shall be taken to the Franklin County Circuit Court within thirty (30) days from the date the order is issued by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 10, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 119, effective July 14, 1992.

441.100.
Leasing out workhouse — Duties of lessee. [Repealed.]

441.105.
Reports to fiscal court and department by jailer.

The jailer shall:

Submit a quarterly report to the fiscal court concerning the physical condition of the jail, the number of jail personnel and personnel needs, and other matters requested by the fiscal court.

Submit a monthly report to the department in electronic format, on forms supplied by the department, containing but not limited to the following information on each prisoner:

The unit of government whose law the prisoner is charged with violating, the statute or ordinance the prisoner is charged with violating, and whether the charge is a felony or misdemeanor;

The status of the prisoner, whether pending trial or post conviction;

The age and sex of the prisoner; and

The county responsible for the incarceration of the prisoner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 11, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 120, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 107, § 9, effective July 15, 2010.

441.110.
Physician for workhouse. [Repealed.]

441.111.
Possession and use of cell phones by jailer, deputy jailers, attorneys, and non-lawyer assistants.

Jailers in a county jail or regional jail shall create policies governing possession and use of cell phones within their jails by the jailer, deputy jailers, attorneys, and non-lawyer assistants as defined in KRS

31.100

. These policies shall be clearly stated and posted in the entry of the jail and copies shall be made available to attorneys and non-lawyer assistants, upon request. These policies shall allow, but may provide reasonable conditions upon, attorneys to use cell phones in connection with their professional services in a detention facility.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 190, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.